California statutes. Insurance Code
(b) Any person or member made a party to any action, suit or proceeding because such person or member served on the board of governors or on a committee or was an officer or employee of the association shall be held harmless and be indemnified by the association against all liability and costs (including the amounts of judgments, settlements, fines or penalties) and expenses incurred in connection with such action, suit or proceeding; provided, however, such indemnification shall not be provided on any matter in which the person or member shall be finally adjudged in any such action, suit or proceeding to have committed a breach of duty involving gross negligence, dishonesty, willful misfeasance or reckless disregard of the responsibilities of his office.

(c) The costs and expenses of such indemnification shall be prorated and paid for by the members in the same manner as provided in the plan of operations for the proration of premiums.

(d) The provisions of this section shall not be construed as creating any right in any third person, and shall be applicable only as between the association and its member insurers and its officers, directors, agents, or employees of the association or its member insurers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 384.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.13.

No member insurer of the association shall engage in the unlawful trade practice defined and condemned in subdivision (g) of Section 790.03.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1205.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.14.

(a) (1) The plan of operation adopted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1063 shall contain provisions whereby each member insurer is required to recoup, in the year following the premium charge, a sum calculated to recoup the premium charge paid by the member insurer under this article by way of a surcharge on premiums charged for insurance policies to which this article applies.

(2) Amounts recouped shall not be considered premiums for any other purpose, including the computation of gross premium tax or agents’ commission.

(b) The plan of operation adopted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section
 1063 shall contain a provision requiring a member insurer to recoup the premium charge amount, as determined by the association, through a surcharge on premiums charged for insurance policies to which this article applies, even if a premium charge was not yet paid to the association because the member insurer had no direct written premium for insurance policies to which this article applies for the prior year. All surcharges collected in this manner shall be remitted to the association within 60 days of the end of the calendar year in which the surcharge is collected.

(c) (1) The amount of any surcharge shall be separately stated on either a billing or policy declaration sent to an insured. The association shall determine the rate of the surcharge and the collection period for each category, and these shall be mandatory for
 all member insurers of the association who write business in those categories.

(2) Each member insurer shall file a report in accordance with the provisions of the plan of operation indicating the amount of surcharges it has collected.

(A) Member insurers who collect surcharges in excess of premium charges paid in the preceding year pursuant to Section 1063.5 shall remit the excess to the association as an additional premium within 30 days after the association has determined the amount of the excess recoupment and given notice to the member insurer of that amount. The excess shall be applied to reduce future premium charges in the appropriate category.

(B) Member insurers who report surcharge collections that are less
 than what they paid in the preceding year’s premium charge shall receive reimbursement from the association for the shortfall in surcharge collection.

(C) Member insurers may amend their reports indicating the amount of surcharges collected for the prior five years if they discover there was an error in the original reports filed with the association.

(d) The plan of operation may permit a member insurer to omit collection of the surcharge from any of its insureds only if the
 expense of collecting the surcharge would exceed the amount of the surcharge, provided, however, that a member insurer is not entitled to reimbursement from the association pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of any amount omitted from collection pursuant to this subdivision.

(e) This section applies only to premium charges paid on or after January 1, 2017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 408, Sec. 4.   (AB 2154)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.145.

The statement of the amount of surcharge required to be provided under subdivision (b) of Section 1063.14 shall include a description of, and purpose for, the California Insurance Guarantee Association, as follows:

“Companies writing property and casualty insurance business in California are required to participate in the California Insurance Guarantee Association. If a company becomes insolvent the California Insurance Guarantee Association settles unpaid claims and assesses each insurance company for its fair share.

California law requires all companies to surcharge policies to recover these assessments. If your policy is surcharged, ’CA Surcharge’ with an amount will be displayed on your premium notice.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 453.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.15.

In any workers’ compensation matter the association shall have the same period of time within which to act or to exercise a right as is accorded to the insurer by the Labor Code, and those time periods shall be tolled against the association until 45 days after the appointment of a domiciliary or receiver.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.17.

(a) All meetings of the board of governors of the association and its investment and audit committees shall be open and public, and all persons shall be permitted to attend any meeting of the association except as otherwise provided in subdivision (g). This shall apply to meetings conducted in person and via teleconference. Attendance at telephonically conducted meetings by members of the public shall be made available by the publication by the association in its meeting notices as set forth below of a call-in number and passcode that members of the public may use to participate in the meeting.

(b) As used in this section, “meeting” includes any congregation of a majority of the members of the board of governors or the investment and audit committee, as applicable, at the same time to hear, discuss, or deliberate upon any item that is within the responsibility of the association as set forth in this article or in the association’s plan of operations. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a meeting shall not include any of the following:

(1) Individual contacts or conversations between a member of the board of governors and any other person, including, but not limited to, any employee or official of the association, that do not violate subdivision (c).

(2) The attendance of a majority of the members of the board of governors or a committee at an industry conference or other gathering organized by a person or organization other than the association, provided that a majority of the members do not discuss among themselves any item that is within the responsibility of the association as set forth in this article or in the association’s plan of operations.

(3) The attendance of a majority of the members, the board of governors, or a committee at a purely social or ceremonial occasion, provided that a majority of the members do not discuss among themselves any item that is within the responsibility of the association as set forth in this article or in the association’s plan of operations.

(c) (1) A majority of the members of the board of governors shall not, outside a meeting authorized by this article, use a series of communications of any kind, directly or through intermediaries, to discuss, deliberate, or take action on any item of business that is within the responsibility of the association as set forth in this article or in the association’s plan of operations.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not be construed as preventing any employee or officer of the association from engaging in separate conversations or communications outside of a meeting authorized by this article with members of the board of governors in order to answer questions or provide information regarding matters within the responsibility of the association, if that person does not communicate to members of the board of governors the comments or position of any other member or members of the board.

(d) All meetings of the association authorized under this article shall comply with the protections and prohibitions contained in Section 202 of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12132), and the federal rules and regulations adopted in implementation of that act.

(e) The association shall provide notice of its meetings that are open and public pursuant to subdivision (a). This notice and an agenda of items to be discussed shall be provided at least 10 days in advance of the meeting via the association’s Internet Web site, and the notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the State of California. In addition, members of the public may request notice by regular mail or by e-mail by making a written request to the association for notice of meetings that are open and public pursuant to subdivision (a). Notice may be waived, or the 10-day period modified with respect to any particular meeting by the board of governors of the association upon request submitted to the commissioner stating the need for a modified notice and exigent circumstances requiring waiver of the notice requirement at least 24 hours in advance of the meeting time set. The approval of the commissioner shall be deemed granted if a written denial of the request for waiver or modification of the notice period is not received at least four hours prior to the commencement of the meeting to be conducted under the modified notice. Notice of a meeting that does not meet the 10-day notice requirement under this subdivision shall be posted on the association’s Internet Web site and provided by e-mail to members of the public who have made a written request for e-mail notice to the association of meetings that are open and public pursuant to subdivision (a). A summary agenda shall be included in each such notice, but members of the board of governors may bring additional items of business to any such meeting.

(f) At any meeting where notice is required pursuant to this section, the association shall reserve time for public comment on the issues addressed at the meeting.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the board of governors of the association or its investment and audit committees from holding a closed meeting or a closed session of an open and public meeting to discuss any of the following subjects:

(1) Bond issuances or other matters relating to borrowings of the association.

(2) Matters regarding the detection and prevention of insolvency of members of the association as contemplated by this article.

(3) Nonpublic information received from liquidators, receivers, and regulators regarding members of the association.

(4) Nonpublic information received from the California Liquidation Office.

(5) Proprietary information regarding third-party administrators, vendors that provide products and services in connection with claims administration, or investments made by the association. Proprietary information also includes information which the association and its corresponding out-of-state associations only have access to pursuant to binding contractual confidentiality provisions.

(6) Nonpublic financial information regarding members of the association, including information in support of requests for assessment deferrals.

(7) Statutory interpretations and other advice received from legal counsel to the association, whether in connection with litigation or otherwise.

(8) Appointment, employment, evaluation of performance, or dismissal of any employee or vendor that provides products and services in connection with claims administration of the association.

(9) Deliberations concerning the purchase, sale, exchange, or lease of real or personal property, including investment property.

(10) Matters posing a threat of criminal or terrorist activity against the association, its personnel, or its property.

(11) Covered claims and purported covered claims against the association.

(12) Disputes and purported disputes with or involving members of the association.

(13) Any other matters as permitted by the commissioner under the association’s approved plan, provided such matters may be heard in a closed meeting or a closed session consistent with Section 11126 of the Government Code.

(h) With respect to any closed meeting or session held as permitted by subdivision (g), the association shall do both of the following:

(1) Disclose, prior to the closed meeting or the closed session, the general nature of the item or items to be discussed in the closed session. The disclosure may take the form of a reference to the item or items as they are listed by number or letter on the agenda. In the closed session, the board of governors may consider only those matters covered in its disclosure. After any closed session, the board of governors shall reconvene in open session prior to adjournment and shall make any reports, provide any documentation, or make any other disclosures that may be required consistent with this article. The announcements required to be made in open session pursuant to this subdivision may be made at the location announced in the agenda for the closed session, as long as the public is allowed to be present at that location for the purpose of hearing the announcement.

(2) Provide periodic reports to the commissioner identifying the matters covered in each such closed meeting or session and the provision of subdivision (g) pursuant to which the subject was discussed.

(i) Nothing in this section shall require or authorize the disclosure of names or other information that would constitute an invasion of privacy or otherwise unnecessarily divulge the particular facts concerning the closed session or the disclosure of which is prohibited by state or federal law.

(j) The commissioner or his or her designated representative shall be permitted to attend all meetings of the board of governors and its investment and audit committees, specifically including closed meetings and sessions. Any information discussed in closed meetings or sessions shall be treated by the commissioner and his or her designated representatives as confidential pursuant to the provisions of Section 12919.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.18.

(a) Nothing in this article requires a final determination of a claim in an insolvent insurer’s liquidation proceeding before a covered claim may be submitted to the California Insurance Guarantee Association (CIGA). Nothing in this article requires a claim to first be determined and approved by the liquidator before CIGA pays and discharges a covered claim. If a claim is presented to the association and all requirements under paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 1063.1 for processing a covered claim are satisfied, the association shall proceed to process the claim for payment under this article.

(b) If the association provides a written denial of a nonworkers’ compensation claim, the person asserting the claim against the association shall have one year to bring an action challenging the denial, including an action for declaratory relief. If the written denial is based on a failure to exhaust other insurance available to pay the claim, a claim shall be reasserted against the association within six months after all other insurance has been exhausted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 85, Sec. 1.   (AB 822)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.19.

(a) The association may administer the Prescribed Fire Claims Fund established by Section 4500 of the Public Resources Code, subject to prior written approval by the commissioner. The association shall seek the commissioner’s approval by amending the association’s plan of operations in accordance with Section 1063.

(b) Upon approval by the commissioner and if contracted to administer the Prescribed Fire Claims Fund by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection on the department’s behalf, the association is authorized to administer or assist in administering the Prescribed Fire Claims Fund consistent with Section 4500 of the Public Resources Code. The association shall not settle or adjust any claims to the fund while seeking to
 subrogate against the fund.

(c) The state, the association, the association’s member insurers, and officers, directors, agents, and employees of the association or its member insurers shall not be liable for claims for losses described in Section 4500 of the Public Resources Code in excess of the amount in the Prescribed Fire Claims Fund or for the costs of administration, loss adjustment, investigation, and defenses relating to those claims in excess of the amount in the fund.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2028, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 606, Sec. 1.   (SB 926)   Effective September 27, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14.26. California Insurance Guarantee Association Bond Funds [1063.70. - 1063.78.]

1063.70.

The California Insurance Guarantee Association is authorized to pay and discharge certain claims of insolvent insurers as defined in Section 1063.1 through the collection of premiums from its members, which amounts are limited by law and take time to assess and collect. This article provides for the ability of CIGA to request the issuance of bonds by the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 63049.6) of Chapter 2 of Division 1 of Title 6.7 of the Government Code to more expeditiously and effectively provide for the payment of covered claims that arise as a result of the insolvencies of insurers admitted to transact insurance in at least one of the categories
 described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1063.5. The bonds are to be paid from the special bond assessments assessed by CIGA for those purposes and the other funds provided pursuant to Section 1063.74. Special bond assessments to repay bonds issued for payment of insurance benefits shall be assessed, to the extent necessary, for the respective category for which bonds are issued. It is a public purpose and in the best interest of the public health, safety, and general welfare of the residents of this state to provide for the issuance of bonds to pay claimants and policyholders having covered claims against insolvent insurers operating in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 408, Sec. 8.   (AB 2154)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.71.

(a) The terms “member insurer,” “insolvent insurer,” and “covered claims” have the meanings assigned those terms in Section 1063.1.

(b) “Bank” means the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank created pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 63020) of Chapter 2, Division 1 of Title 6.7 of the Government Code.

(c) “Board” means the board of governors of CIGA.

(d) “Bonds” means bonds issued by the Bank pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 63049.6) of Chapter 2 of Division 1 of Title 6.7 of
 the Government Code to provide funds for the payment of the covered claims and the adjusting and defense expenses relating to those claims that are issued at the request of the board pursuant to Section 1063.73.

(e) “Collateral” means the special bond assessments, the right of CIGA to be paid the special bond assessments, all revenues therefrom, the separate accounts of the Workers’ Compensation Bond Fund, the Homeowners’ and Automobile Bond Fund, and the Other Bond Fund into which special bond assessments are deposited, and the proceeds thereof.

(f) “CIGA” means the California Insurance Guarantee Association, established pursuant to Article 14.2 (commencing with Section 1063).

(g) “Commissioner” means the
 Insurance Commissioner.

(h) “Department” means the Department of Insurance.

(i) “Homeowners’ and Automobile Bond Fund” means the fund created pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1063.72.

(j) “Other Bond Fund” means the fund created pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1063.72.

(k) “Special bond assessment” means the premiums collected by CIGA pursuant to Section 1063.74.

(l) “Workers’ Compensation Bond Fund” means the fund created pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1063.72.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 408, Sec. 9.   (AB 2154)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.72.

(a) The Workers’ Compensation Bond Fund is hereby created.

 (1) Proceeds from the sale of bonds with respect to the workers’ compensation category described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1063.5 shall be deposited in a separate account in the Workers’ Compensation Bond Fund. Only CIGA, and, with respect to payment of the bonds, the trustee for the bonds, shall have the ability to authorize disbursements from the separate account within the Workers’ Compensation Bond Fund.

(2) Special bond assessments levied pursuant to Section 1063.74 with respect to the
 workers’ compensation category shall be deposited in a separate account in the Workers’ Compensation Bond Fund and shall not be commingled with any other moneys. Only the trustee for the bonds shall have the ability to authorize disbursements from this separate account within the Workers’ Compensation Bond Fund, and CIGA shall have no right or authority to authorize disbursements from this separate account.

(3) The Workers’ Compensation Bond Fund shall be maintained with the trustee for the bonds. Following payment or provision for payment of the bonds, amounts in the Workers’ Compensation Bond Fund shall be transferred to the fund that is designated in the indenture for the bonds.

(4) All money in the Workers’ Compensation Bond Fund and all special bond assessments levied
 pursuant to Section 1063.74 with respect to the workers’ compensation category shall be used by CIGA for the exclusive purpose of carrying out the purposes of this part. Notwithstanding any other law, the Workers’ Compensation Bond Fund is not a state fund and shall not be subject to the rules or procedures of any fund in the State Treasury, and application of the fund shall not be subject to the supervision or budgetary approval of any officer or division of state government.

(5) CIGA and the trustee for the bonds may, as necessary or convenient to the accomplishment of any other purpose under this article, divide the Workers’ Compensation Bond Fund into separate accounts.

(b) The Homeowners’ and Automobile Bond Fund is hereby created.

(1) Proceeds from the sale of bonds with respect to the homeowners’ and automobile category described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1063.5 shall be deposited in a separate account in the Homeowners’ and Automobile Bond Fund. Only CIGA, and, with respect to payment of the bonds, the trustee for the bonds, shall have the ability to authorize disbursements from the separate account within the Homeowners’ and Automobile Bond Fund.

(2) Special bond assessments levied pursuant to Section 1063.74 with respect to the homeowners’ and automobile category shall be deposited in a separate account in the Homeowners’ and Automobile Bond Fund and shall not be commingled with any other moneys. Only the trustee for the bonds shall have the ability to
 authorize disbursements from this separate account within the Homeowners’ and Automobile Bond Fund, and CIGA shall have no right or authority to authorize disbursements from this separate account.

(3) The Homeowners’ and Automobile Bond Fund shall be maintained with the trustee for the bonds. Following payment or provision for payment of the bonds, amounts in the Homeowners’ and Automobile Bond Fund shall be transferred to the fund that is designated in the indenture for the bonds.

(4) All money in the Homeowners’ and Automobile Bond Fund and all special bond assessments levied pursuant to Section 1063.74 with respect to the homeowners’ and automobile category shall be used by CIGA for the exclusive purpose of carrying out the purposes of this part. Notwithstanding any other
 law, the Homeowners’ and Automobile Bond Fund is not a state fund and shall not be subject to the rules or procedures of any fund in the State Treasury, and application of the fund shall not be subject to the supervision or budgetary approval of any officer or division of state government.

(5) CIGA and the trustee for the bonds may, as necessary or convenient to the accomplishment of any other purpose under this article, divide the Homeowners’ and Automobile Bond Fund into separate accounts.

(c) The Other Bond Fund is hereby created.

(1) Proceeds from the sale of bonds with respect to the other category described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1063.5 shall be deposited in a separate account
 in the Other Bond Fund. Only CIGA, and, with respect to payment of the bonds, the trustee for the bonds, shall have the ability to authorize disbursements from the separate account within the Other Bond Fund.

(2) Special bond assessments levied pursuant to Section 1063.74 with respect to the other category shall be deposited in a separate account in the Other Bond Fund and shall not be commingled with any other moneys. Only the trustee for the bonds shall have the ability to authorize disbursements from this separate account within the Other Bond Fund, and CIGA shall have no right or authority to authorize disbursements from this separate account.

(3) The Other Bond Fund shall be maintained with the trustee for the bonds. Following payment or provision for payment of the bonds,
 amounts in the Other Bond Fund shall be transferred to the fund that is designated in the indenture for the bonds.

(4) All money in the Other Bond Fund and all special bond assessments levied pursuant to Section 1063.74 with respect to the other category shall be used by CIGA for the exclusive purpose of carrying out the purposes of this part. Notwithstanding any other law, the Other Bond Fund is not a state fund and shall not be subject to the rules or procedures of any fund in the State Treasury, and application of the fund shall not be subject to the supervision or budgetary approval of any officer or division of state government.

(5) CIGA and the trustee for the bonds may, as necessary or convenient to the accomplishment of any other purpose under this article, divide the
 Other Bond Fund into separate accounts.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 408, Sec. 11.   (AB 2154)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.73.

In the event CIGA determines that the insolvency of one or more member insurers providing insurance in at least one of the categories described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1063.5 will result in covered claim obligations in excess of CIGA’s capacity to pay from current funds, the board, in its sole discretion, may by resolution request the Bank to issue bonds pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 63049.6) of Chapter 2 of Division 1 of Title 6.7 of the Government Code to provide funds for the payment of the covered claims and the adjusting and defense expenses relating to those claims. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, CIGA is hereby authorized to borrow proceeds of the bonds to provide for
 those purposes. CIGA may request the Bank to issue bonds pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 63049.6) of Chapter 2 of Division 1 of Title 6.7 of the Government Code. CIGA shall provide the commissioner with a copy of the request and the commissioner may, within 30 days of receipt of the request, modify, cancel, or require a delay in the requested issuance. The proceeds of bonds issued for any category of insurance benefits may be used by CIGA to reimburse funds advanced or temporarily loaned from other categories.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 408, Sec. 12.   (AB 2154)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.74.

(a) Notwithstanding any other limits on assessments, CIGA shall have the authority to levy upon member insurers special bond assessments in the amount necessary to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds, and to meet other requirements established by agreements relating to the bonds. The assessments shall be collected only from the member insurers providing insurance in the category described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1063.5 for which the bonds are issued, and shall be applied in the same manner as separate premium payments are used to pay the claims and costs allocated to that category pursuant to Section 1063.5. Special bond assessments made pursuant to this section shall also be subject to the surcharge
 provisions in Sections 1063.14 and 1063.145.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, after all bonds issued pursuant to this article have been redeemed, no further initial special bond assessments shall be levied or made. Any premium adjustments called for and described in Section 1063.5, as applied to special bond assessments initially charged, shall continue to be made and determined. Any credits or charges that result from the premium adjustments on the special bond assessments shall be credited or charged to the assessments called for and described in Section 1063.5.

(c) In addition to the special bond assessments provided for in this section, the board in its discretion and subject to other obligations of the association, may utilize current funds of CIGA, premium assessments
 made under Section 1063.5, and advances or dividends received from the liquidators of insolvent insurers to pay the principal of and interest on any bonds issued at the board’s request and shall utilize, to the extent feasible, the recoveries from the liquidators of the estates of insolvent insurers in the respective category of insurance to pay bonds issued at the board’s request to fund the corresponding insurance claims in that category of insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 408, Sec. 13.   (AB 2154)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.75.

Bonds issued to provide funds for covered claim obligations for workers’ compensation claims, homeowners’ and automobile claims, as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1063.5, and other claims, as described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1063.5, shall be issued in an aggregate principal amount outstanding for each category not to exceed at any one time one billion five hundred million dollars ($1,500,000,000) for that category. Any bonds issued or issued to refund bonds shall not have a final maturity exceeding 20 years from the date of issuance. The bonds shall be issued at the request of CIGA, shall be in the form, shall bear the date or dates, and shall mature at the time or times
 as the indenture authorized by the request may provide. The bonds may be issued in one or more series, as serial bonds or as term bonds, or as a combination thereof, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law, the amount of principal of, or interest on, bonds maturing at each date of maturity need not be equal. The bonds shall bear interest at the rate or rates, variable or fixed or a combination thereof, be in the denominations, be in the form, either coupon or registered, carry the registration privileges, be executed in the manner, be payable in the medium of payment at the place or places within or without the state, be subject to the terms of redemption, contain the terms and conditions, and be secured by the covenants as the indenture may provide. The indenture may provide for the proceeds of the bonds and funds securing the bonds to be invested in any securities and investments, including investment
 agreements, as specified therein. CIGA may enter into or authorize any ancillary obligations or derivative agreements as it determines necessary or desirable to manage interest rate risk or security features related to the bonds. The bonds shall be sold at public or private sale by the Treasurer at, above, or below the principal amount thereof, on the terms and conditions and for the consideration in the medium of payment that the Treasurer shall determine prior to the sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 408, Sec. 14.   (AB 2154)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.76.

(a) The collateral shall be used solely for the purpose of paying the principal and redemption price of, and interest on, the bonds and any amounts owing by CIGA under contracts entered into pursuant to Section 1063.77, and shall not be used for any other purpose. Member insurers shall pay the special bond assessments directly to the trustee for the bonds. Any collateral in the possession of CIGA shall be held by CIGA in trust for the benefit of the trustee for the bonds.

(b) Upon the issuance of the first bond, the collateral shall be subject to a first priority statutory lien in favor of the trustee for the bonds, for the benefit of the holders of the bonds and the parties to the contracts entered into pursuant to Section 1063.77, to secure the payment of the principal and redemption price of, and interest on, the bonds and any amounts owing by CIGA under contracts entered into pursuant to Section 1063.77. This lien shall arise by operation of law automatically without any action on the part of CIGA, the bank, or any other person. This lien is a continuous lien on all collateral effective from the time the first bond is issued, whether or not a particular item of collateral exists at the time of the issuance. From the time the first bond is issued, this lien shall be valid, effective, prior, perfected, binding, and enforceable against CIGA, its successors, purchasers of the collateral, creditors, and all others asserting rights in the collateral, irrespective of whether those parties have notice of the lien and without the need for any physical delivery, recordation, filing, or further act. Upon default in the payment of the principal or redemption price of, or interest on, the bonds, or any amounts owing by CIGA under contracts entered into pursuant to Section 1063.77, the trustee for the bonds shall be entitled to foreclose or otherwise enforce this lien on the collateral.

(c) No person acting under any provision of law or principle of equity shall be permitted in any way to impede or in any manner interfere with (1) the full and timely payment of the principal and redemption price of, and interest on, the bonds and any amounts owing by CIGA under contracts entered into pursuant to Section 1063.77, or (2) the statutory lien created by this section and the full and timely application of the collateral to the payment of the principal and redemption price of, and interest on, the bonds and any amounts owing by CIGA under contracts entered into pursuant to Section 1063.77.

(d) None of the collateral shall be subject to garnishment, levy, execution, attachment, or other process, writ (including writ of mandate), or remedy in connection with the assertion or enforcement of any debt, claim, settlement, or judgment against the state, the department, the commissioner, the bank, CIGA, or the board, nor shall any of the collateral be subject to the claims of any creditor of the state, the department, the commissioner, the bank, CIGA, or the board. This paragraph shall not limit the rights or remedies of the trustee for the bonds, the holders of the bonds, or the parties to contracts entered into pursuant to Section 1063.77.

(e) As long as any bond is outstanding, CIGA shall not be subject to Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) or Article 14.3 (commencing with Section 1064.1) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 635, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.77.

CIGA is authorized to enter into those contracts or agreements with those banks, insurers, or other financial institutions or parties that it determines are necessary or desirable to improve the security and marketability of, or to manage interest rates or other risks associated with, the bonds issued pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 63049.6) of Chapter 2 of Division 1 of Title 6.7 of the Government Code. Those contracts or agreements may contain an obligation to reimburse, with interest, any of those banks, insurers, or other financial institutions or parties for advances used to pay the purchase price of, or principal or interest on, the bonds or other obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 635, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.78.

If the board requests the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank to issue bonds pursuant to Section 1063.70, the board shall report all of the following to the Assembly Committee on Insurance and the Senate Committee on Insurance within 60 days of the request, and annually thereafter while the bonds remain outstanding:

(a) The amount of the bonds requested.

(b) The reason for the requested bonds.

(c) Details of covered claims obligations requiring the issuance of bonds.

(d) Planned bond repayment assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 408, Sec. 15.   (AB 2154)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14.3. Uniform Liquidation Act [1064.1. - 1064.13.]

1064.1.

For the purposes of this act:

(a) “Insurer” means any person subject to the insurance supervisory authority of, or to liquidation, rehabilitation, reorganization, or conservation by the commissioner or the equivalent insurance supervisory official of another state. 

(b) “Delinquency proceeding” means any proceeding commenced against an insurer for the purpose of liquidating, rehabilitating, reorganizing, or conserving that insurer.

(c) “Foreign country” means territory not in any state.

(d) “Domiciliary state” means the state in which an insurer is incorporated or organized, or, in the case of an insurer incorporated or organized in a foreign country, the state in which the insurer, having become authorized to do business in the state, has, at the commencement of delinquency proceedings, the largest amount of its assets held in trust and assets held on deposit for the benefit of its policyholders or policyholders and creditors in the United States; and any such insurer is deemed to be domiciled in such state.
